Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.080

Certification—Qualifications.

(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction, that the following requirements have been met to practice as:

(a) A diagnostic radiologic technologist, therapeutic radiologic technologist, magnetic resonance imaging technologist, or nuclear medicine technologist:

(i) Graduation from an approved school or successful completion of alternate training that meets the criteria established by the secretary;

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologic technology examination approved by the secretary; and

(iii) Good moral character;

(b) A radiologist assistant:

(i) Satisfactory completion of an approved radiologist assistant program;

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a radiologist assistant examination approved by the secretary; and

(iii) Good moral character; or

(c) A cardiovascular invasive specialist:

(i) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive specialist program or alternate training approved by the secretary. The secretary may only approve a cardiovascular invasive specialist program that includes training in the following subjects: Cardiovascular anatomy and physiology, pharmacology, radiation physics and safety, radiation imaging and positioning, medical recordkeeping, and multicultural health as required by RCW 43.70.615(3);

(ii) Satisfactory completion of a cardiovascular invasive specialist examination approved by the secretary. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c)(ii), the secretary may approve an examination administered by a national credentialing organization for cardiovascular invasive specialists; and

(iii) Good moral character.

(2) Applicants shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional license under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(3) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the requirements for certification and for designation of certification in a particular field of radiologic technology.

[ 2024 c 94 s 2; 2010 c 92 s 2; 2008 c 246 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 209; 1987 c 412 s 9.]

NOTES:

Interpretation—2010 c 92: "Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to alter the scope of practice of any other credentialed health profession or to limit the ability of any other credentialed health professional to assist in cardiac or vascular catheterization if such assistance is within the professional's scope of practice." [ 2010 c 92 s 5.]